src/scripts/Brazilian-Portuguese/numbers.foma
# Copyright (C) 2019, 2020  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

source bp_roman.foma

define MapRomanNumeral 
BPRomanMapping -> || .#. _ .#. ; 

define MaleOrdChar %º ; 
define FemaleOrdChar %ª ; 
define OrdChar MaleOrdChar | FemaleOrdChar ; 

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ; 
define Digit %0|NZDigit ; 

define UnformattedNumber [NZDigit Digit^<15] ; 
define FormattedNumber NZDigit Digit^<3 [%. Digit^3]^{1,4} ; 
define Number [[UnformattedNumber | FormattedNumber] (OrdChar)] | BPRomanNumeral ; 

define Unit 
1:um | 
2:dois | 
3:três | 
4:quatro | 
5:cinco | 
6:seis | 
7:sete | 
8:oito | 
9:nove ; 

define MaleOrdUnit 
1:primeiro | 
2:segundo | 
3:terceiro | 
4:quarto | 
5:quinto | 
6:sexto | 
7:sétimo | 
8:oitavo | 
9:nono ; 

define FemaleOrdUnit 
1:primeira | 
2:segunda | 
3:terceira | 
4:quarta | 
5:quinta | 
6:sexta | 
7:sétima | 
8:oitava | 
9:nona ; 


define Teen 
1:onze | 
2:doze | 
3:treze | 
4:catorze | 
5:quinze | 
6:dezesseis | 
7:dezessete | 
8:dezoito | 
9:dezenove ; 

define Ten 
1:dez | 
2:vinte | 
3:trinta | 
4:quarenta | 
5:cinquenta | 
6:sessenta | 
7:setenta | 
8:oitenta | 
9:noventa ; 

define MaleOrdTen 
1:décimo | 
2:vigésimo | 
3:trigésimo | 
4:quadragésimo | 
5:quinquagésimo | 
6:sexagésimo | 
7:setuagésimo | 
8:octogésimo | 
9:nonagésimo ; 

define FemaleOrdTen 
1:décima | 
2:vigésima | 
3:trigésima | 
4:quadragésima | 
5:quinquagésima | 
6:sexagésima | 
7:setuagésima | 
8:octogésima | 
9:nonagésima ; 


define Hundred 
1:cento | 
2:duzentos | 
3:trezentos | 
4:quatrocentos | 
5:quinhentos | 
6:seiscentos | 
7:setecentos | 
8:oitocentos | 
9:novecentos ; 

define MaleOrdHundred 
1:centésimo | 
2:ducentésimo | 
3:trecentésimo | 
4:quatringentésimo | 
5:quingentésimo | 
6:sessentésimo | 
7:setingentésimo | 
8:octocentésimo | 
9:noningentésimo ; 

define FemaleOrdHundred 
1:centésima | 
2:ducentésima | 
3:trecentésima | 
4:quatringentésima | 
5:quingentésima | 
6:sessentésima | 
7:setingentésima | 
8:octocentésima | 
9:noningentésima ; 

define PowerOfThousandSymbol ths|mlns|blns|tlns|mln|bln|tln ; 
define TenOrHundredSymbol ten|hnd0|hnd ; 
define PowerOfTenSymbol TenOrHundredSymbol|PowerOfThousandSymbol ; 

define OrdPowerOfThousandSymbol thth|mlnth|blnth|tlnth ; 
define OrdTenOrHundredSymbol tenth|hndth ; 
define OrdPowerOfTenSymbol OrdTenOrHundredSymbol|OrdPowerOfThousandSymbol ; 

define SeparatePowerOfThousand(s) [..] -> s || Digit _ Digit^3 [.#.|\Digit] ; 

define RemoveSilentGroups 
%0^3 (PowerOfThousandSymbol) @-> 0 ; 

define SeparateHundreds 
[..] -> hnd || Digit _ Digit^2 ; 

define Mark100s 
hnd -> hnd0 || 1 _ {00} ; 

define SeparateTens 
[..] -> ten || Digit _ Digit ; 

define MarkTenth 
ten -> tenth || Digit _ Digit OrdChar ; 

define MarkHundredth 
[hnd|hnd0] -> hndth || Digit _ Digit tenth ; 

define MarkThousandth 
ths -> thth || Digit _ [Digit hndth] | OrdChar ; 

define MarkOrdPowerOfThousand 
mlns:mlnth | blns:blnth | tlns:tlnth -> || _ OrdChar ; 

define RemoveZeros 
%0 ([TenOrHundredSymbol | OrdTenOrHundredSymbol]) @-> 0 ; 

define MarkTeens 
[[1 ten]:0] NZDigit [0:teen] -> ; 

define InsertAnds 
[..] -> and || 
NZDigit ten _ NZDigit , 
NZDigit hnd _ (%0 ten) NZDigit , 
PowerOfThousandSymbol _ [[NZDigit [hnd|hnd0] %0 ten %0] | [%0 hnd (%0 ten) NZDigit]] .#. ; 

define RemoveOnes 
1 -> 0 || .#. _ ths | OrdPowerOfThousandSymbol ; 

define PowerOfThousandSymbolsToSingular 
[mlns:mln|blns:bln|tlns:tln] -> || [[PowerOfThousandSymbol (and)]|.#.] 1 _ ; 

define Translate 
OrdChar -> 0 ,, 
Unit -> || _ .#. | PowerOfThousandSymbol | OrdPowerOfThousandSymbol ,, 
MaleOrdUnit -> || _ MaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
FemaleOrdUnit -> || _ FemaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
Teen [teen:0] -> || _ ,, 
Ten [ten:0] -> || _ ,, 
MaleOrdTen [tenth:0] -> || _ ?* MaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
FemaleOrdTen [tenth:0] -> || _ ?* FemaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
Hundred [hnd:0] -> || _ ,, 
1 hnd0 -> cem || _ ,, 
MaleOrdHundred [hndth:0] -> || _ ?* MaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
FemaleOrdHundred [hndth:0] -> || _ ?* FemaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
ths -> mil || _ ,, 
and -> e || _ ,, 
[mln:milhão | bln:bilhão | tln:trilhão] -> || _ ,, 
[mlns:milhões | blns:bilhões | tlns:trilhões] -> || _ ,, 
[thth:milésimo | mlnth:milionésimo | blnth:bilionésimo | tlnth:trilionésimo] -> || _ ?* MaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
[thth:milésima | mlnth:milionésima | blnth:bilionésima | tlnth:trilionésima] -> || _ ?* FemaleOrdChar .#. ; 

define RemoveThousandsSeparators 
%. -> 0 ; 

define NumberRules 
Number .o. 
MapRomanNumeral .o. 
RemoveThousandsSeparators .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(ths) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(mlns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(blns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(tlns) .o. 
RemoveSilentGroups .o. 
SeparateHundreds .o. 
Mark100s .o. 
SeparateTens .o. 
MarkTenth .o. 
MarkHundredth .o. 
MarkThousandth .o. 
MarkOrdPowerOfThousand .o. 
MarkTeens .o. 
InsertAnds .o. 
RemoveZeros .o. 
PowerOfThousandSymbolsToSingular .o. 
RemoveOnes .o. 
Translate ; 

define ZeroRule 
%0 : zero | 
[%0 MaleOrdChar] : zerésimo | 
[%0 FemaleOrdChar] : zerésima ; 

regex 
ZeroRule | NumberRules ; 
